Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.50.130

Lobbyists' duties, restrictions—Penalties for violations. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) A person required to register as a lobbyist under RCW 29B.50.010 shall substantiate financial reports required to be made under this title with accounts, bills, receipts, books, papers, and other necessary documents and records. All such documents must be obtained and preserved for a period of at least five years from the date of filing the statement containing such items and shall be made available for inspection by the commission at any time. If the terms of the lobbyist's employment contract require that these records be turned over to the lobbyist's employer, responsibility for the preservation and inspection of these records under this subsection shall be with such employer.

(2) A person required to register as a lobbyist under RCW 29B.50.010 shall not:

(a) Engage in any lobbying activity before registering as a lobbyist;

(b) Knowingly deceive or attempt to deceive a legislator regarding the facts pertaining to any pending or proposed legislation;

(c) Cause or influence the introduction of a bill or amendment to that bill for the purpose of later being employed to secure its defeat;

(d) Knowingly represent an interest adverse to the lobbyist's employer without full disclosure of the adverse interest to the employer and obtaining the employer's written consent;

(e) Exercise any undue influence, extortion, or unlawful retaliation upon any legislator due to the legislator's position or vote on any pending or proposed legislation;

(f) Enter into any agreement, arrangement, or understanding in which any portion of the lobbyist's compensation is or will be contingent upon the lobbyist's success in influencing legislation.

(3) A violation by a lobbyist of this section shall be cause for revocation of the lobbyist's registration, and may subject the lobbyist and the lobbyist's employer, if the employer aids, abets, ratifies, or confirms the violation, to other civil liabilities as provided by this title.

[ 2024 c 164 s 485; 2019 c 428 s 34; 2010 c 204 s 812; 1987 c 201 s 2; 1982 c 147 s 14; 1973 c 1 s 23 (Initiative Measure No. 276, approved November 7, 1972). Formerly RCW 42.17A.655, 42.17.230.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Finding—Effective date—2019 c 428: See notes following RCW 29B.20.110.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.

Effective date—Construction—1973 c 1: See notes following RCW 29B.05.010.